Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.170

Possessing stolen property in the third degree.

(1) A person is guilty of possessing stolen property in the third degree if he or she possesses (a) stolen property which does not exceed seven hundred fifty dollars in value, or (b) ten or more stolen merchandise pallets, or ten or more stolen beverage crates, or a combination of ten or more stolen merchandise pallets and beverage crates.

(2) Possessing stolen property in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2009 c 431 s 14; 1998 c 236 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.170.]

NOTES:

Applicability—2009 c 431: See note following RCW 4.24.230.

Property crime database, liability: RCW 4.24.340.